District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0856.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Expanding Access for Student Identification Empowers Readers
(EASIER) Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Any student identification card issued by a local education agency to comply with
the Student Identification Card Act of 2025, as introduced on October 6, 2025 (Bill 26-420), shall:
(1) Provide all the functions of a library card issued by the District of Columbia
Public Library;
(2) Entitle the bearer to access Department of Parks and Recreation facilities;
(3) Convey how to contact the 988 Suicide & Crisis Lifeline; and
(4) Be provided free of charge.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved


October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24,
1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).